Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Wyoming Public Television Endowment Account

§ 21-23-201.
Wyoming public television accounts.

The Wyoming public television endowment account is created.

The state treasurer shall invest amounts deposited within the Wyoming public television endowment account in accordance with law. All investment earnings shall be credited to the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, other funds within the account shall not lapse or revert until and unless directed by the legislature and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

2015 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 67, § 3, makes the act effective March 2, 2015.

§ 21-23-202.
Wyoming public television matching program; state treasurer to administer program accounts; matching payments; conditions; reversion of appropriations.

The Wyoming public television matching funds account is created.

The state treasurer shall administer the Wyoming public television endowment account and Wyoming public television matching funds account established under this article. The following shall apply:

Funds from the Wyoming public television endowment account shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Wyoming public television matching funds account to equally match each cash gift received by Wyoming public television and deposited to the matching funds account. A match shall be paid by the state treasurer from the Wyoming public television endowment account at the time any accumulated amounts actually deposited to the matching funds account total ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) or more;

The state treasurer shall make transfers to the Wyoming public television matching funds account not later than the end of the calendar quarter following the quarter during which deposits to the matching funds account total at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00). If gifts are made through a series of payments or transfers, no matching funds shall be transferred under this section until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received totals at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00);

Funds in the matching funds account shall remain inviolate and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law. Only the earnings from investments of the monies in the matching funds account may be distributed. The state treasurer shall distribute earnings from the matching funds account to the community college commission as provided in W.S.

9-4-108

. The community college commission shall distribute these funds together with other appropriated funds to the central Wyoming community college district board for the operations and programming of Wyoming public television pursuant to W.S. 21-18-105(b).

History.

2015 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in (b)(iii), added "shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law" at the end of the first sentence and made a related change, deleted "investment" preceding "earnings" in the current second sentence and substituted "earnings" for "income" in the current third sentence.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (b), substituted "earnings" for "income" and "as provided in W.S.

9-4-108

" for "quarterly."

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 67, § 3, makes the act effective March 2, 2015.